Arkansas, session 2025, SB602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 66, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
23-66-322. Motor vehicle safety glass repair practices — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "motor vehicle safety glass" means glass
for which a deductible shall not be applied under this section when being
repaired or replaced.
(b) A motor vehicle physical damage appraiser shall not require that
motor vehicle safety glass repair or replacement work be performed or not be
performed in or by a specified facility or glass shop.
(c) An insurance company doing business in this state or a third-party
claims administrator, agent, or adjuster for an insurance company doing
*ANS395*
04-07-2025 11:47:00 ANS395

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB602
business in this state shall not:
(1) Require an insured to use a specific person for the
provision of motor vehicle safety glass repair or replacement work; or
(2) State that choosing a facility other than a glass shop
participating in a motor vehicle safety glass repair or replacement work
program established by the insurance company will or may result in delays in
or a lack of guarantee for the motor vehicle safety glass work.
(d)(1) If there is any communication between a glass claims
representative for an insurance company doing business in this state or a
third-party claims administrator for the insurance company and an insured
regarding motor vehicle safety glass repair or replacement work or motor
vehicle glass products, in the initial contact with the insured, the
representative or third-party claims administrator shall state or disclose to
the insured a statement substantially similar to the following:
"You have the right to choose a glass shop where the damage to your motor
vehicle will be repaired. If you have a preference, please let us know.".
(2) Unless a glass claims representative for an insurance
company doing business in this state or a third-party claims administrator
for the insurance company provides the insured with the name of at least one
(1) additional glass shop in the area where the motor vehicle safety glass
work is to be performed, the claims representative or the claims
administrator shall not provide an insured with the name of, schedule an
appointment for an insured with, or direct an insured to, a glass shop that
is owned by:
(A) The insurance company;
(B) The claims administrator; or
(C) The same parent company as the insurance company or
the claims administrator.
(e) In addition to the penalties available under the Trade Practices
Act, § 23-66-201 et seq., a violation of this section is:
(1) An unfair trade practice under the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.; and
(2) Subject to remedies and penalties under the Deceptive Trade
Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.

/s/Crowell
04-07-2025 11:47:00 ANS395